Utah statutes.
41-6a-513.   Acceptance of plea of guilty to DUI -- Restrictions -- Verification of prior violations -- Prosecutor to examine defendant's record.

(1)  A court may not accept a plea of guilty or no contest to a charge under Section 41-6a-502 unless:

(a)  the prosecutor agrees to the plea:

(i)  in open court;

(ii)  in writing; or

(iii)  by another means of communication which the court finds adequate to record the prosecutor's agreement;

(b)  the charge is filed by information as defined under Section 77-1-3; or

(c)  the court receives verification from a law enforcement agency that the defendant's driver license record contains no record of a conviction, arrest, or charge for:

(i)  more than one prior violation within the previous 10 years of any offense which, if the defendant were convicted, would qualify as a "conviction" as defined under Subsection 41-6a-501(2);

(ii)  a felony violation of Section 41-6a-502; or

(iii)  automobile homicide under Section 76-5-207.

(2)  A verification under Subsection (1)(c) may be made by:

(a)  a written indication on the citation;

(b)  a separate written document; or

(c)  any other means which the court finds adequate to record the law enforcement agency's verification.

(3) (a)  Prior to agreeing to a plea of guilty or no contest or to filing an information under Subsection (1), the prosecutor shall examine the criminal history or driver license record of the defendant.

(b)  If the defendant's record contains a conviction or unresolved arrest or charge for an offense listed in Subsections (1)(c)(i) through (iii), a plea may only be accepted if:

(i)  approved by:

(A)  a district attorney;

(B)  a deputy district attorney;

(C)  a county attorney;

(D)  a deputy county attorney;

(E)  the attorney general; or

(F)  an assistant attorney general; and

(ii)  the attorney giving approval under Subsection (3)(b)(i) has felony jurisdiction over the case.

(4)  A plea of guilty or no contest is not made invalid by the failure of the court, prosecutor, or law enforcement agency to comply with this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

